Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Informal Proceedings

§ 43-21-401.
Informal adjustment.

Informal adjustment pursuant to the informal adjustment agreement provided in Section 43-21-405 shall include:

the giving of counsel and advice to the child and his parent, guardian or custodian;

referrals to public and private agencies which may provide benefits, guidance or services to the child and his parent, guardian or custodian;

temporary placement of the child or supervision by the youth court counselor with the consent of the child and his parent, guardian or custodian, subject to youth court review.

If authorized by the youth court, informal adjustment may be commenced after the filing of a petition.

If the child and his parent, guardian or custodian agree to participate in an informal adjustment process, the defense of a failure to provide a speedy trial is waived and a petition may be filed if the informal adjustment process is unsuccessfully terminated under Section 43-21-407.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-403.
Notice to parties.

When it is determined to make an informal adjustment, the child and his parent, guardian or custodian shall be requested by letter, telephone or otherwise to attend a conference at a designated date, time and place. At the time the request to attend the conference is made, the child and his parent, guardian or custodian shall be informed that attendance at the conference is voluntary and that they may be represented by counsel or other person of their choice at the conference.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-405.
Informal adjustment process.

The informal adjustment process shall be initiated with an informal adjustment conference conducted by an informal adjustment counselor appointed by the judge or his designee.

If the child and his parent, guardian or custodian appear at the informal adjustment conference without counsel, the informal adjustment counselor shall, at the commencement of the conference, inform them of their right to counsel, the child’s right to appointment of counsel and the right of the child to remain silent. If either the child or his parent, guardian or custodian indicates a desire to be represented by counsel, the informal adjustment counselor shall adjourn the conference to afford an opportunity to secure counsel.

At the beginning of the informal adjustment conference, the informal adjustment counselor shall inform the child and his parent, guardian or custodian:

That information has been received concerning the child which appears to establish jurisdiction of the youth court;

The purpose of the informal adjustment conference;

That during the informal adjustment process no petition will be filed;

That the informal adjustment process is voluntary with the child and his parent, guardian or custodian and that they may withdraw from the informal adjustment at any time; and

The circumstances under which the informal adjustment process can be terminated under Section 43-21-407.

The informal adjustment counselor shall then discuss with the child and his parent, guardian or custodian:

Recommendations for actions or conduct in the interest of the child to correct the conditions of behavior or environment which may exist;

Continuing conferences and contacts with the child and his parent, guardian or custodian by the informal adjustment counselor or other authorized persons; and

The child’s general behavior, his home and school environment and other factors bearing upon the proposed informal adjustment.

After the parties have agreed upon the appropriate terms and conditions of informal adjustment, the informal adjustment counselor and the child and his parent, guardian or custodian shall sign a written informal adjustment agreement setting forth the terms and conditions of the informal adjustment. The informal adjustment agreement may be modified at any time upon the consent of all parties to the informal adjustment conference.

The informal adjustment process shall not continue beyond a period of six (6) months from its commencement unless extended by the youth court for an additional period not to exceed six (6) months by court authorization prior to the expiration of the original six-month period. In no event shall the custody or supervision of a child which has been placed with the Department of Public Welfare be continued or extended except upon a written finding by the youth court judge or referee that reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the child within his own home, but that the circumstances warrant his removal and there is no reasonable alternative to custody, and that reasonable efforts will continue to be made towards reunification of the family.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 46; Laws, 1985, ch. 486, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1985).

§ 43-21-407.
Termination of informal adjustment.

If it appears to the informal adjustment counselor that the child and his parent, guardian or custodian:

have complied with the terms and conditions of the informal adjustment agreement; and

have received the maximum benefit from the informal adjustment process, the informal adjustment counselor shall terminate the informal adjustment process and dismiss the child without further proceedings. The informal adjustment counselor shall notify the child and his parent, guardian or custodian in writing of the satisfactory completion of the informal adjustment and report such action to the youth court.

If it appears to the informal adjustment counselor that further efforts at informal adjustment would not be in the best interests of the child or the community, or that the child or his parent, guardian or custodian:

denies the jurisdiction of the youth court;

declines to participate in the informal adjustment process;

expresses a desire that the facts be determined by the youth court;

fails without reasonable excuse to attend scheduled meetings;

appears unable or unwilling to benefit from the informal adjustment process, the informal adjustment counselor shall terminate the informal adjustment process. If the informal adjustment process is so terminated, the intake unit shall reinitiate the intake procedure under Section 43-21-357. Even if the informal adjustment process has been so terminated, the intake unit shall not be precluded from reinitiating the informal adjustment process.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 1979.